District of Columbia statutes.
24-531.06

Court hearings during and after treatment.

(a)

The Court shall hold a prompt hearing, with reasonable notice of such hearing given to the prosecuting attorney, the defendant, and the defendant’s attorney of record, and make a new finding as to the defendant’s competence when:

(1)

Any period of treatment ordered under § 24-531.05(b), (c), or (e) is completed; or

(2)

The treatment provider reports to the court that reasonable grounds exist to believe that:

(A)

An incompetent defendant has attained competence;

(B)

There is no longer a substantial probability that a defendant will attain competence during the allowable treatment period;

(C)

If the defendant is committed to an inpatient treatment facility, such commitment is no longer the least restrictive setting considering the factors in § 24-531.05(a); or

(D)

If the defendant has been ordered to undergo competence treatment on an outpatient basis, such a setting is no longer appropriate considering the factors in § 24-531.05(a).

(b)

In advance of any hearing held pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the treatment provider shall submit a written report to the court addressing:

(1)

The defendant’s competence, including any progress or lack thereof made toward attaining competence;

(2)

Whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will attain competence during the foreseeable future, or make substantial progress toward that goal;

(3)

If the defendant is committed to an inpatient facility, whether such commitment remains the least restrictive setting considering the factors in § 24-531.05(a); and

(4)

If the defendant has been ordered to undergo treatment on an outpatient basis, whether such a setting is no longer appropriate considering the factors in § 24-531.05(a).

(c)

(1)

At the conclusion of a hearing held pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court shall:

(A)

Find that the defendant is competent; or

(B)

Find that the defendant is incompetent and:

(i)

There is a substantial probability that the defendant will attain competence or make substantial progress toward that goal with an additional period of time; or

(ii)

There is no substantial probability that he or she will attain competence or make substantial progress toward that goal in the foreseeable future.

(2)

If the court finds the defendant is competent, it shall order the criminal case or transfer proceeding to be resumed.

(3)

If the court finds the defendant is incompetent pursuant to paragraph (1)(B)(i) of this subsection, the court shall order treatment for an additional period of time in accordance with § 24-531.05(b), (c), or (e), after making a finding as to the least restrictive placement for treatment pursuant to § 24-531.05(a).

(4)

If the court finds the defendant is incompetent pursuant to paragraph (1)(B)(ii) of this subsection, the court shall either order the release of the defendant or, where appropriate, enter an order for treatment pursuant to § 24-531.05(a) for up to 30 days pending the filing of a petition for civil commitment pursuant to subchapter IV of Chapter 5 of Title 21 or subchapter IV of Chapter 13 of Title 7. The court also may order treatment pursuant to § 24-531.07(a)(2) for such period as is necessary for the completion of the civil commitment proceedings.

History

May 24, 2005, D.C. Law 15-358, § 106, 52 DCR 2015

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-531.04, § 24-531.05, § 24-531.07, and § 24-531.09.